West Virginia, session 2025, HB3170.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 6. Landlord and tenant. §37-6-30a. Sewage requirements for rental properties. (a) All rental properties in this state must be equipped with approved sewer systems and not straight piping of sewage. (b) Any property that was previously used as a primary dwelling by the property owner, but has since been used as a rental property, must have updated plumbing to current standards, and must have an approved sewer system in place.